Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BUILDING ASSETS, REDUCING RISKS CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Commissioner of education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin BARR Center. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to the Building Assets, Reducing Risks (BARR) Center to deliver an evidence-based, research-validated program to schools: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 127A.20, the BARR Center must apply for the grants in the form and manner specified by the commissioner of education. The BARR Center must deliver an evidence-based, research-validated program that provides school coaching support, professional development, and curriculum and resources over a three-year period to each qualifying school site. new text end new text begin (c) The BARR Center must select at least 40 schools to participate in the program. The schools must be geographically balanced among urban, suburban, and rural schools and serve high concentrations of students in poverty or high concentrations of underrepresented students, including students who are from Black, Indigenous, and People of Color communities. new text end new text begin (d) The grants to the BARR Center must be directed toward: new text end new text begin (1) improving student social and emotional skills and engagement in school; new text end new text begin (2) increasing opportunity and academic achievement for students of color and those experiencing poverty; new text end new text begin (3) improving teacher satisfaction and effectiveness; and new text end new text begin (4) increasing the number of students who earn a high school diploma. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to three percent of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin (f) The fiscal year 2026 appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. The fiscal year 2027 appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end